Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Article 9. Vegetable Marketing.

§ 69-7-401.
Marketing committee and districts.

A committee is hereby created to consist of seven members, four of whom shall be producers of vegetables and three of whom shall be handlers of vegetables, to be nominated and appointed as herein provided, from the following described districts:

District No. 1 shall be composed of Beat No. 5 of Copiah County and all of Simpson County and shall be represented by two producers and one handler.

District No. 2 shall be composed of Beats No. 1, No. 2 and No. 3 of Copiah County and all of the counties of Jefferson, Lincoln and Lawrence, and shall be represented by one producer and one handler.

District No. 3 shall be composed of Beat No. 4 of Copiah County and all of the counties of Hinds, Rankin and Claiborne, and shall be represented by one producer and one handler.

On or before March fifteenth of each year, the committee then serving shall call meetings and select a committee as herein authorized, the members of which shall serve for a period of one year beginning April first of each year, or until their successors have been appointed. A vacancy from any cause shall be filled in the same manner. Members shall serve without compensation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4526; Laws, 1940, ch. 312.

§ 69-7-403.
Additional districts and committee.

A committee is hereby created to consist of nine members, six of whom shall be producers of fruits or vegetables and three of whom shall be handlers of fruits or vegetables, to be nominated and appointed as herein provided, from the following described districts:

District No. 1 shall be composed of Lamar County and shall be represented by one producer.

District No. 2 shall be composed of Stone County and shall be represented by one producer.

District No. 3 shall be composed of Perry County and shall be represented by one producer.

District No. 4 shall be composed of Jefferson Davis County and shall be represented by one producer.

District No. 5 shall be composed of Covington County and shall be represented by one producer.

District No. 6 shall be composed of a combination of all of the above named counties, and shall be represented by four handlers selected from the counties at large.

Committee members provided for in this section shall be chosen at meetings of growers or shippers held prior to March 15th of each year, such meetings to be called by the committee then serving. Members shall serve for a period of one year beginning April 1st, each year and shall serve without compensation. Any vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as the selection of a member.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4531; Laws, 1942, ch. 256.

§ 69-7-405.
Regulation of marketing.

Whenever either the committee created by Section 69-7-401 or the committee created by Section 69-7-403 deems it advisable to regulate the marketing of fresh vegetables in any manner considered by them to be helpful to the industry during any specified period, it may so recommend in writing to the commissioner of agriculture and commerce. At the time of submitting such recommendations the committee shall furnish to the commissioner of agriculture and commerce all pertinent data and information upon which it acted in making such recommendations, along with such other data and information as the commissioner of agriculture and commerce may request.

Based upon the recommendation of the committee created for the districts under consideration and upon the information submitted in connection therewith, and upon other available data, the commissioner of agriculture and commerce may regulate the marketing of fresh vegetables produced in the area defined by this article, for any specified period, by regulating the handling of any vegetable produced in the districts defined in Section 69-7-401 or Section 69-7-403 in one or more of the following manners:

By prohibiting unfair methods of competition and unfair trade practices in the purchase or sale thereof.

By limiting the grade, size, and maturity of any vegetable which each handler may purchase from or handle on behalf of any and all producers thereof during any specified period or periods.

Providing that any vegetable or any grade, size or quality thereof shall be purchased or sold or offered for sale by the handlers thereof only at prices filed by such handlers in the manner provided in such regulation.

Providing for the regulating of the handling of any vegetable in the same manner and for the same period in effect under any federal marketing agreement.

Specifying standard containers which may be used in the purchase or sale of any vegetables.

Requiring that all containers used in the sale of any vegetable shall be plainly marked with the grade and size of the contents therein.

With respect to the districts defined in Section 69-7-401, in order to provide proper maturity requiring that no vegetable may be sold prior to a date fixed in the regulation without permission from the commissioner of agriculture and commerce.

With respect to the districts defined in Section 69-7-403, in order to provide proper maturity requiring that no vegetable may be sold prior to a date fixed in the regulation.

The commissioner of agriculture and commerce shall immediately make publication for the issuance of any such regulations.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 4527, 4532; Laws, 1940, ch. 312; Laws, 1942, ch. 256.

§ 69-7-407.
Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce to enforce regulations.

The Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce shall have authority and police power to enforce any and all regulations issued pursuant thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 4528, 4533; Laws, 1940, ch. 312; Laws, 1942, ch. 256.

§ 69-7-409.
Penalties.

Every person, who by themselves, their agents or employees, violates any of the provisions of this article or any regulations issued under the provisions of this article shall for each offense be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall upon conviction thereof, be punished by a fine not exceeding $25.00, nor less than $5.00 or 30 days in jail for the first offense; not exceeding $50.00 nor less than $40.00 or 60 days in jail for the second offense; not exceeding $200.00 nor less than $100.00 or 90 days in jail or both for the third and all following offenses, and all costs for each and every offense.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 4529, 4534; Laws, 1940, ch. 312; Laws, 1942, ch. 256.